Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.70, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11b. new text end new text begin Minnesota intercollegiate sport tickets and admissions. new text end new text begin (a) Tickets and admissions to games and events for an intercollegiate sport sponsored by a public institution of higher education are exempt. new text end new text begin (b) For the purposes of this subdivision: new text end new text begin (1) "intercollegiate sport" means a sport played at the collegiate level for which eligibility requirements for participation by a student athlete are established by a national association that promotes or regulates collegiate athletics; and new text end new text begin (2) "public institution of higher education" means a state university, a state community college, a state technical college, or the University of Minnesota. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end